Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-651.01
Districts; payments in lieu of taxes.

Every public power district or public power and irrigation district owning property with respect to which it made payments in lieu of taxes in the 1957 calendar year, shall, so long as it continues to own such property, continue to pay annually the same amounts in the same manner. The directors of any such district shall not have any personal liability by reason of such payments made either before or after September 28, 1959.

Laws 1959, c. 317, § 1, p. 1163.